Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-910
Notice of motion; contents.

Where notice of a motion is required, it must be in writing and shall state (1) the names of the parties to the action or proceeding in which it is to be made, (2) the name of the court or judge before whom it is to be made, (3) the place where and the day on which it will be heard, (4) the nature and terms of the order or orders to be applied for, and (5) if affidavits are to be used on the hearing, the notice shall state that fact. It shall be served a reasonable time before the hearing.

R.S.1867, Code § 574, p. 495;

R.S.1913, § 7726;

C.S.1922, § 8670;

C.S.1929, § 20-910;

R.S.1943, § 25-910.

Orders for alimony may be modified for good cause shown but nunc pro tunc decree entered without notice is a nullity. Howard v. Howard, 196 Neb. 351, 242 N.W.2d 884 (1976).

Application or motion to set aside order vacating decree of divorce, and to reinstate decree, was after the term and required notice. Carmony v. Carmony, 112 Neb. 651, 200 N.W. 830 (1924).

Notice not under seal of court is process in nature of summons. Fowler v. Brown, 51 Neb. 414, 71 N.W. 54 (1897).

What is reasonable notice stated. Sterling Mfg. Co. v. Hough, 49 Neb. 618, 68 N.W. 1019 (1896).

This section requires that when notice of a motion is required and if affidavits are to be used on the hearing, the notice shall state that fact. Galaxy Telecom v. SRS, Inc., 13 Neb. App. 178, 689 N.W.2d 866 (2004).